Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.276

Select committee on pension policy—Creation—Membership—Terms of office—Staff support.

(1) The select committee on pension policy is created. The select committee consists of:

(a) Four members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees shall be members of the senate ways and means committee;

(b) Four members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees shall be members of the house of representatives appropriations committee;

(c) Four active members or representatives from organizations of active members of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms, with no more than two appointees representing any one employee retirement system;

(d) Two retired members or representatives of retired members' organizations of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms, with no two members from the same system;

(e) Four employer representatives of members of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms; and

(f) The directors of the department of retirement systems and office of financial management.

(2)(a) The term of office of each member of the house of representatives or senate serving on the committee runs from the close of the session in which he or she is appointed until the close of the next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a successor is not appointed during a session, the member's term continues until the member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office for a committee member who is a member of the house of representatives or the senate who does not continue as a member of the senate or house of representatives ceases upon the convening of the next session of the legislature during the odd-numbered year following the member's appointment, or upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier. All vacancies of positions held by members of the legislature must be filled from the same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat was vacated.

(b) Following the terms of members and representatives appointed under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the retiree positions shall be rotated to ensure that each system has an opportunity to have a retiree representative on the committee.

(3) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson. The chairperson shall be a member of the senate in even-numbered years and a member of the house of representatives in odd-numbered years and the vice chairperson shall be a member of the house of representatives in even-numbered years and a member of the senate in odd-numbered years.

(4) The committee shall establish an executive committee of six members, including the chairperson, the vice chairperson, one member from subsection (1)(c) of this section, one member from subsection (1)(d) of this section, one member from subsection (1)(e) of this section, and the director of the department of retirement systems.

(5) Nonlegislative members of the select committee serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The office of state actuary under chapter 44.44 RCW shall provide staff and technical support to the committee.

[ 2005 c 24 s 1; 2003 c 295 s 1.]